Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202157-1618
Carbon dioxide; title; liability.

The storage operator has title to the carbon dioxide injected into and stored in a storage reservoir and holds title until the commission issues a certificate of project completion under section 57-1619. While the storage operator holds title, the operator is liable for any damage the carbon dioxide may cause, including damage caused by carbon dioxide that escapes from the storage facility.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 18.
August 28, 2021